Tennessee, session 114, HB1319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-3-1113, is amended by deleting
"June 30, 2025" and substituting "June 30, 2030".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1319
001625
- 1 -